Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-407. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Active employee” means an eligible individual currently employed by a participating entity or participating institution;

“Aggregate performance information” means a report or other means of communication about the measurement of accomplishment of the execution of certain tasks, achievement of certain results, or occurrence of certain events related to all patients or to a class or group of patients identifiable by certain criteria;

“Consumer-driven health insurance plan option” means a qualified high deductible health plan option with high out-of-pocket costs adopted by the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board that is consistent with guidance provided by the Internal Revenue Service for health savings accounts, annual contribution limits, and high deductible health insurance plans under Revenue Procedure 2013-25 and subsequent guidance;

“Dependent” means a participant's:

Natural child, stepchild, or adopted child who is eligible for coverage under the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program; and

Spouse who is eligible for coverage under the program.

Beginning in the 2015 plan year, “dependent” does not include:

An individual who is legally separated or divorced from the participant; or

A participant’s spouse if the spouse is offered healthcare coverage, other than the program, through a separate employer-funded or employee-funded benefit plan that provides healthcare coverage of essential health benefits as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 18022, as existing on January 1, 2013;

“Eligible inactive retiree” means a former member of the General Assembly or a state-elected constitutional officer who has served a sufficient number of years of credited service to be eligible for retirement benefits but who has not yet reached retirement age.

An eligible inactive retiree who enrolls in the program shall pay the entire premium cost of the plan option selected under the program as set by the board;

“Health savings account” means an account established by a participant under a medical care savings account program to pay the eligible medical expenses of a participant and the dependents of the participant;

“High deductible” means the deductible limitations for a qualified high deductible health plan under the Internal Revenue Service, as adjusted annually for inflation based upon the board's calculation using the formula provided by 26 U.S.C. § 1(f)(3)–(6);

“Participant” means an individual or an individual's dependent who is enrolled in a plan option offered under the program and continues to be eligible for participation in the program;

“Participating entity” means an organization authorized to participate in the program, including without limitation a state agency, school district, public charter school, or education service cooperative;

“Participating institution” means a two-year or four-year college that is participating in the program;

“Prepayment” means collection of medical or life insurance premiums or both medical and life insurance premiums from the employee and employer one (1) month in advance;

“Public school employee” means an employee of a school district or public charter school;

“Qualifying event” means a change in an employee's personal life that may impact his or her eligibility or a dependent's eligibility for benefits, as defined by Internal Revenue Service guidelines;

“Quality-of-care information” means the contents of medical records, member claims, patient surveys, pharmacy data, lab data, and other records of or reports about systems, networks, hospitals, and clinical providers to be gathered for assessment of the quality and costs of health care provided by systems, networks, hospitals, and clinical providers;

“Quality performance indicator” means a specific inquiry or standard that when applied to quality-of-care information reveals a quantifiable measure of success or failure in system, network, hospital, or clinical provider care;

“Retiree” means a retired employee who is eligible under § 21-5-411;

“Rural school district” means a school district or a public charter school that has an average daily membership of one thousand (1,000) students or less;

“State employee” means an employee of a state agency, board, or commission whose position is budgeted for by the General Assembly; and

“Vendor” means a corporation, partnership, or other organization that is:

Licensed to do business and in good standing with the State of Arkansas; and

Lawfully engaged in administering employer-funded or employee-funded benefit plans for employer groups in consideration of an administration fee.

Publisher's Notes. Former §21-5-407, concerning the supervisor of the State Employees Insurance Section, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 9. The former section was derived from Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, §§ 6, 8; 1973, No. 842, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 749, § 4; 1981, No. 838, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3106, 12-3108.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment redesignated (2) as (2)(A) and (B); in (2)(A), inserted “in an alternate retirement plan as defined in §24-7-801” following “a retiree,” deleted “as defined in §24-7-801” from the end, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 rewrote the section.

The 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 substituted “participant's child or spouse” for “member of a participant's family” in (3)(A); added (3)(B); in (7), deleted “covered” preceding “dependent” and added “and continues to be eligible for participation in the program” to the end; and added (16).

The 2015 amendment by No. 910 added (19) [now (1)].

The 2015 amendment by No. 911, in (3)(A) [now (4)(A)], inserted the (i) designation and added (ii); and substituted “Natural child, stepchild, or adopted child” for “child or spouse” in (3)(A)(i).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 7; 1999, No. 1280, § 7; 2005, No. 1937, § 2; 2007, No. 1009, § 7; 2009, No. 252, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, §§ 7-9; 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.) No. 6, §§ 7-9; 2015, No. 910, § 4; 2015, No. 911, § 1.

21-5-408. Compensation.

State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board members may receive from the Department of Finance and Administration expense reimbursement and stipends as allowable under §25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 6; 1997, No. 250, § 213; 1997, No. 1354, § 39; 1999, No. 1280, § 8; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2.

Publisher's Notes. Former §21-5-408, concerning cooperation among agencies, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 9. The former section was derived from Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3114.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 substituted “and stipends as allowable under” for “as authorized by law and stipends in accordance with”.

21-5-409. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning procedure for selecting policies, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 9. The section was derived from Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 11; 1973, No. 574, § 1; 1981, No. 749, § 6; 1981, No. 838, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3111, 12-3111.1.

21-5-410. Eligibility generally — Definition.

Individuals eligible to participate in the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program include:

All active state employees, active public school employees, or other eligible employees of a participating entity or participating institution;

Members of the General Assembly;

Elected constitutional officers;

Appointed or elected board and commission members who are on a full-time salaried basis; and

Those state contract employees hired by the Arkansas National Guard on a full-time basis in accordance with 10 U.S.C. § 2304.

Program participation for contract employees of the Arkansas National Guard is conditioned upon the United States Government’s contributing the employer's share to the Employee Benefits Division.

Program participation for a state employee is conditioned upon the state employee's being in a budgeted state employee position or a position authorized by the General Assembly.

A state employee is one whose actual performance of duty requires one thousand (1,000) or more working hours per year.

If a participating institution discontinues its participation in the program, then the participating institution shall not re-participate in the program for two (2) years after the institution's final date of participation in the program unless the Director of the Employee Benefits Division gives his or her consent to an earlier date.

Participants are not allowed simultaneous participation in benefits provided by the state employee insurance plan or the public school employee insurance plan.

The Arkansas State Police Health Benefit Plan is exempt from any mandatory participation required by this section.

The following persons are eligible to participate in the program:

A public school employee who is in a position that requires on average at least thirty (30) hours per week of actual performance of duty during the annual school year; and

A full-time school bus driver who is employed by a public school district to drive regular routes during the annual school year.

A public school employee who is not a full-time school bus driver and who is in a variable hour position is ineligible to participate in the program.

As used in this section, “full-time school bus driver” means a person:

Who contracts with a public school district to operate a school bus for at least seven hundred twenty (720) hours during the school year;

Whose primary source of income during the school year is obtained by operating a school bus for a public school district; or

Who contracts with a public school district to operate a school bus and is designated by the superintendent as a full-time school bus driver, regardless of the number of hours for which the person contracted.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment substituted “Employees — Eligibility” for “Eligibility of employees generally” in the section head; redesignated former (a) as present (a)(1) through (a)(5); added (c); redesignated former (c) as present (d); and added (e) and (f).

The 2009 amendment substituted “An employee is one” for “Employees” in (c).

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 rewrote the section heading, the introductory language of (a) and (a)(1); deleted “the provisions of” following “in accordance with” in (a)(5)(A); substituted “Program participation for” for “Membership of the” in (a)(5)(B) and (b); substituted “Government's” for “Government” in (a)(5)(B); substituted “state employee's” for the second occurrence of “employee” in (b); substituted “A state” for “An” in (c); substituted “program, then the participating institution shall” for “group health and life insurance program instituted pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter, then the institution may” in (d); rewrote (e); and substituted “is” for “shall be” in (f).

The 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 7 added (g).

The 2019 amendment, in (g), added (g)(1)(B) and rewrote the remaining provisions; and added (h).

Participating members of:

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, including the members of the legislative division and the contract personnel of the Arkansas National Guard;

Applies for participation in the program within thirty-one (31) days of returning to active employment; and

Is employed in a position that is eligible to participate in the program.

If the retirement benefit is to be withheld from a retirement benefit check and the retirement benefit check is not large enough for the premium deduction, the premium shall be paid by monthly bank draft on a designated date prescribed by the division.

Members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System who retire before January 2, 1988, under the Incentives for Early Retirement Act, §§ 24-4-732, 24-5-122, and 24-6-102, shall not pay the full amount of the premium but shall pay a portion of the cost of the policy as set forth by the Incentives for Early Retirement Act, §§ 24-4-732, 24-5-122, and 24-6-102.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this section, any future change in program participation other than cancellation shall be allowed only for newly acquired dependents.

The active or inactive retiree declined health insurance coverage for the dependent at the time of election to be an active or inactive retiree because the dependent had other employer-sponsored group health insurance coverage;

Subsequent to the active or inactive retiree's declination of health insurance coverage for the dependent under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section, the dependent involuntarily lost his or her employer-sponsored group health insurance coverage and the loss of health insurance coverage was not the result of:

Fraud; or

Voluntary cessation of premium payment while the active or inactive retiree was covered by a plan option offered under the program; and

Within thirty (30) days of a dependent's involuntary loss of health insurance coverage under subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this section, the active or inactive retiree submits to the board proof that:

The dependent involuntarily lost health insurance coverage; and

Until the dependent's loss of health insurance coverage, the coverage had been continuous.

(1)If a retiree dies and has covered dependents at the time of death, the dependents have the right to continue participation in the program.

A surviving spouse may continue participation in the program.

If a surviving spouse or dependent declines participation in the program or cancels existing participation, then the surviving spouse or dependent has no further privileges under the program.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2001 amendment by Nos. 1171 and 1752 rewrote (a); in (c), added “technical institutes … and the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services,” and substituted “five (5)” for “ten (10)”; in (e), added “and specified in writing that the reason for the declination was that the”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment by No. 87 added (A) and (B) subdivisions in (b)(2); in (b)(2)(A)(i), substituted “check” for “checks” and “participant; or” for “participants”; added (b)(2)(A)(ii); and inserted “to be withheld from a retirement benefit check and the retirement benefit check is” in (b)(2)(B).

The 2013 amendment by No. 331 substituted “eligible for coverage” for “covered” in (a)(2)(B)(i); in (a)(2)(B)(ii), deleted “employer sponsored group” and inserted “that is not an accident only, specific disease, or other limited benefit policy” and inserted “or at the time of open enrollment”; and added (a)(2)(B)(iii).

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 rewrote the introductory language of (a)(1); substituted “one (1) or more of the retirement systems listed under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section” for “the systems” in (a)(1)(B); rewrote (a)(2)(A)(i); in (a)(2)(A)(ii), deleted “retiree insurance” preceding “program,” substituted “state employee retiree or public school employee retiree's” for “member's” and substituted “division” for “Employee Benefits Division”; in (a)(2)(B)(i), substituted “in the program, the retiree” for “member” and “retiree's” for “member's”; in (a)(2)(B)(ii), substituted “to participate in the program” for the first occurrence of “coverage,” “specified” for “specific,” and “participate in the” for “return to the retiree insurance”; in (a)(2)(B)(iii), substituted “State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board” for “board” and “participating in the program” for “making an election”; in (a)(2)(C)(i), inserted “to participate in the program” and deleted “health” preceding “program” near the end; rewrote (a)(2)(C)(ii); in (a)(3)(A), substituted “a state employee or public school” for “an” and “continued participation in the program if the state employee or public school” for “continuation of health insurance coverage offered by the board if that”; in (a)(3)(B)(i), substituted “A state employee or public school employee qualifying for continued participation in the program” for “An employee qualifying for continuation of coverage” and “participation in the program under this section by notifying the division” for “health insurance coverage under this section by notifying the Employee Benefits Division”; in (a)(3)(B)(ii), inserted “to continue participation in the program” and substituted “division” for “Employee Benefits Division”; in (a)(3)(C)(i), substituted “elect to continue participation in the program” for “make an election” and deleted “health” preceding “program” near the end; rewrote (a)(3)(C)(ii); substituted “under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of” for “within” in (a)(3)(D); rewrote (a)(4); in (b)(1), substituted “Retirees” for “Persons” and “program” for “group insurance program provided for in this subchapter”; deleted “or cost” following “premium” from the introductory language of (b)(2)(A); substituted “participant” for “participants” in (b)(2)(A)(i); substituted “division” for “Employee Benefits Division” in (b)(2)(A)(ii) and (b)(2)(B); in (c), deleted “the provisions of” following “under” and substituted “pay the full amount of the premium but” for “have to pay the full amount of the premium and”; in (d), substituted “program participation” for “coverage” near the beginning and substituted “a plan option offered under the program” for “the plan”; and rewrote (e).

The 2015 amendment by No. 364 added (a)(5); in (a)(2)(C)(ii)(a) and (a)(3)(C)(ii) [now (a)(3)(C)(ii)(a) ], substituted “determined” for “established” and inserted “under subdivision (a)(5) of this section”; inserted “as determined by the board under subdivision (a)(5) of this section” in (a)(3)(D) and (b)(1).

The 2015 amendment by No. 913, substituted “thirty (30) days” for “thirty-one (31) days” in (a)(2)(A)(ii); substituted “covered” for “eligible for coverage” in (a)(2)(B)(i); rewrote (a)(2)(B)(ii); deleted (a)(2)(B)(iii); substituted “thirty-day election” for “thirty-one-day election” in (a)(2)(C)(i); rewrote (a)(2)(C)(ii); in (a)(3)(C)(i), substituted “(a)(2)(B)(ii)” for “(a)(3)(C)(ii)” and “thirty-day election” for “thirty-one day election”; and rewrote (a)(3)(C)(ii) and (d).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Employee Benefits Division” in (a)(2)(A)(ii).

An elected official qualifying for continuation of participation in the program under this subsection shall be considered an eligible inactive retiree and shall have thirty-one (31) days from the effective date of termination to elect to continue program participation by notifying the Employee Benefits Division in writing on forms required by the division.

The eligible inactive retiree shall pay the full amount of the insurance premium.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(C)(ii) of this section, an eligible inactive retiree's failure to elect to participate in the program during the thirty-one-day election period or an eligible inactive retiree's election to decline participation in the program is final.

An eligible inactive retiree who declined to participate in the program and any dependents of the eligible inactive retiree shall qualify for participation in the program upon payment of the appropriate premium as established by the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board, provided the eligible inactive retiree applies for program participation within thirty-one (31) days of the loss of eligibility if:

The eligible inactive retiree who declined to participate in the program specifies in writing that the reason for the declination is that the eligible inactive retiree had coverage through another group health plan;

The eligible inactive retiree's coverage was subsequently terminated because of a loss of eligibility; and

The eligible inactive retiree provides information from the former insurance company confirming the loss of coverage.

Amendments. The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 substituted “officials” for “officers” in the section heading; substituted “the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program” for “state employees', life and health programs” in (a); in (b)(1), substituted “A” for “Any,” “office” for “officer,” and “program” for “state employees' life and disability program provided for in this subchapter”; rewrote (b)(2)(A); in (b)(2)(B)(i), substituted “official” for “officer,” “participation in the program” for “coverage,” “program participation” for “health insurance coverage under this section,” and “division” for “Employee Benefits Division”; in (b)(2)(C)(i), substituted “elect to participate in the program during the thirty-one-day” for “make an election during the thirty one day” and deleted “health” preceding “program” near the end; rewrote (b)(2)(C)(ii); in (b)(2)(C)(ii)(a) , substituted “to participate in the program” for “coverage,” “that” for “because,” and “had” for “has”; substituted “was” for “is” in (b)(2)(C)(ii)(b) ; in (b)(2)(D)(i), inserted “eligible” preceding “inactive,” inserted “the premium under,” and substituted “as” for “premium”; and substituted “under §21-5-411(a)(1)(A)” for “within this section” in (b)(2)(D)(ii).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Employee Benefits Division” in (b)(2)(B)(i).

U.S. Code. The Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, referred to in this section, is codified throughout Titles 5, 15, 19, 20, 26, 38, and 42 of the U.S. Code.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning employer contributions, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 1009, § 11. The section was derived from Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3112.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas State Employee and Public School Personnel Board” in (a); and rewrote (b).

The 2001 amendment redesignated former (b) as present (b)(1) and (b)(2); in (b)(1), substituted “multiplied by” for “times,” “three hundred fifty dollars ($350)” for “two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275),” and “State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board” for “board”; and, in (b)(2), substituted “department” for “Department of Finance and Administration” and “for that purpose” for “for such purpose.”

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6, in (a), inserted “state” preceding “contributions” and added “to the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program on behalf of state employees” to the end; and, in (b)(1), substituted “state agencies participating in the program” for “agencies participating in the plans adopted by the state” and “state employees participating in the program” for “employees of the state participating in the plan sponsored by the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board”.

The 2015 amendment redesignated former (b)(1) as (b) and substituted “Participating entities shall” for “The State of Arkansas, on behalf of state agencies participating in the program, is authorized to,” “benefits” for “insurance,” and inserted “and retirees” at the end; and deleted (b)(2).

The 2017 amendment substituted “four hundred fifty dollars ($450)” for “four hundred twenty-five dollars ($425)” in (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Department of Finance and Administration” in (a).

An eligible inactive retiree shall be charged the premium under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, Pub. L. No. 99-272, as determined by the board to be actuarially sound with administrative fees deemed appropriate.

An eligible inactive retiree shall be reclassified as an active retiree upon electing to receive a retirement benefit by a retirement system listed under § 21-5-411(a)(1)(A) and shall be charged the premium rate appropriate for his or her rating category as an active retiree.

The Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall seek the advice of the Legislative Council and the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce before additional state contributions can be made to the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program on behalf of state employees.

Participating entities shall make a monthly contribution equal to the number of budgeted state employee positions multiplied by the monthly contribution authorized by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, not to exceed four hundred fifty dollars ($450) monthly for each state employee budgeted position into a fund designated for state employee health benefits to partially defray the cost of life and health benefits for state employees and retirees participating in the program.

(1)If any participating state agency or school district does not remit insurance premiums and required monthly reports to the Employee Benefits Division by the last calendar day of each billing month, the division shall impose a penalty of two dollars ($2.00) per insured member or one hundred dollars ($100), whichever is greater.

Invoices shall be processed at the beginning of the month following the infraction.

Penalties are payable to the division and shall be delivered to the division no later than the last calendar day of the month following invoicing.

If payment is not delivered to the division by the due date, the following collection methods may be used:

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may cause the amount sought to be transferred to the division from:

Funds the state agency or school district has on deposit with the Treasurer of State; or

Any funds the state agency or school district is due from the state.

If a transfer is made, a transfer penalty of twenty dollars ($20.00) per transfer shall be assessed each state agency or school district fund and included in the transfer;

The state agency director or school district superintendent may be required to appear before the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board to report the reasons for nonpayment or incorrect reporting; and

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may use his or her powers outlined in § 19-4-301 et seq. to aid in collection.

Nonpayment of premiums by a school district, state agency, or agency assuming the responsibility for paying health and life insurance premiums for its employees may result in a lapse of health and life insurance coverage for participating state employees and public school employees of the school district or state agency.

Require the participating entity or participating institution to pay the total amount of the insured's premium; and

Impose a penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) per insured.

(A)Penalties shall be assessed and invoiced based on the actual number of violations.

Invoices shall be processed at the beginning of the month following discovery of the infraction.

Penalties are payable to the division and shall be delivered to the division by the last calendar day of the month following invoicing.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may cause the amount sought to be transferred from:

Funds the state agency or school district has on deposit with the Treasurer of State; or

Any funds the state agency or school district is due from the state.

If a transfer is made, a transfer penalty of twenty dollars ($20.00) per transfer shall be assessed each state agency or school district fund and included in the transfer.

The division may correct any error regarding an insured's benefits according to existing documentation without authorization or prior notification to the state agency or school district.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment added the subdivision designations in (a); rewrote present (a)(1), (b)(1) and (d)(1); inserted “per insured” in (d)(2); rewrote (e); and added (f) and (g).

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 inserted “state” preceding “agency” throughout the section; redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(2)(A) and (B) and substituted “shall” for “will” in both; substituted “are payable to the division and shall be delivered to” for “shall be payable to the Employee Benefits Division and must be received by” in (a)(3); substituted “delivered to” for “received by” in the introductory language of (a)(4); substituted “is” for “must be” in (a)(4)(A)(ii); rewrote (a)(5) and the introductory language of (b)(1); substituted “participating entity or participating institution” for “agency” in (b)(1)(A); redesignated former (b)(2) as (b)(2)(A) and (B) and substituted “shall” for “will” in both; and substituted “are payable to the division and shall be delivered to the division” for “shall be payable to the Employee Benefits Division and must be received” in (b)(3).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Employee Benefits Division” in (a)(1); and substituted “Director of the Employee Benefits Division” for “Executive Director of the Employee Benefits Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” in the introductory language of (b)(1).

History.

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 13; 1975, No. 575, § 3; 1977, No. 206, § 1; 1983, No. 423, § 4; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3113; Acts 2001, No. 1814, §§ 2, 4; 2007, No. 1009, § 8; 2009, No. 252, § 3; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 1; 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.) No. 7, § 1; 2019, No. 563, §§ 1, 2.

21-5-411. Eligibility of certain retired employees — Definition.

(1)If qualified, state employee retirees and public school employee retirees may continue coverage and participate in the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program if the state employee retirees or public school employee retirees are:

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System;

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System; or

An alternate retirement plan of a qualifying institution under §24-7-801; and

Retired and drawing benefits under one (1) or more of the retirement systems listed under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section.

(A)(i)If a state employee retiree or a public school employee retiree who is a member of a retirement system listed under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section receives retirement benefits, thereby becoming an active retiree, the active retiree may elect to enroll in the program.

The election to enroll in the program shall be made within thirty (30) days of the state employee retiree's or public school employee retiree's becoming an active retiree and shall be made in writing to the Employee Benefits Division on forms required by the division.

(i)To be eligible to continue coverage or to qualify for coverage after electing to decline participation in the program, the retiree must have been covered on the last day of the retiree's employment.

If a retiree declines to participate in the program at the time of retirement because the retiree is already covered under another employer-sponsored group health insurance policy, the retiree may make a one-time election to participate in the program with proof of continued insurance coverage at the time of open enrollment or if the retiree experiences a qualifying event.

(i)Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(C)(ii) of this section, an active retiree's failure to make an election to participate in the program during the thirty-day election period or an active retiree's election to decline participation in the program is final.

If an active retiree declines participation in the program because the active retiree has health insurance coverage through another employer group health plan and the active retiree's coverage was subsequently terminated because of a loss of eligibility, as defined by Internal Revenue Service regulations, and provides information from the former insurance company of the loss of eligibility, then the active retiree shall qualify for participation in the program upon payment of the appropriate premium as determined by the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board under subdivision (a)(5) of this section if the active retiree applies for participation in the program within thirty (30) days of the loss of eligibility.

(A)Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this section, a state employee or public school employee with ten (10) or more years of creditable service under the terms of a retirement plan listed in this section shall qualify for continued participation in the program if the state employee or public school employee is separated from employment because of the expiration of a fixed period of employment.

(i)A state employee or public school employee qualifying for continued participation in the program under this subsection shall be considered an inactive retiree and shall have thirty-one (31) days from the effective date of termination to elect to continue participation in the program under this section by notifying the division.

The election to continue participation in the program shall be made in writing on forms required by the division.

(i)Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B)(ii) of this section, an inactive retiree's failure to elect to continue participation in the program during the thirty-day election period or an inactive retiree's election to decline participation in the program is final.

If an inactive retiree as described in subdivision (a)(3)(B) of this section declines participation in the program because the inactive retiree has health insurance coverage through another employer-sponsored group health plan and the inactive retiree's coverage is subsequently terminated because of a loss of eligibility, then the inactive retiree and any dependents shall qualify for participation in the program if, within thirty (30) days of the inactive retiree's involuntary loss of coverage, the inactive retiree submits to the board:

Payment of the appropriate premium as determined by the board under subdivision (a)(5) of this section; and

Proof that, until the inactive retiree's involuntary loss of coverage through another employer-sponsored group health plan, the coverage had been continuous.

An eligible inactive retiree shall be reclassified as an active retiree upon electing to receive a retirement benefit by a retirement system listed under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section and shall be charged the premium rate appropriate for his or her rating category as an active retiree as determined by the board under subdivision (a)(5) of this section.

(A)As used in this subsection, “loss of eligibility” means a loss of coverage as a result of:

A legal separation;

Divorce;

Death of the insured;

Termination of employment; or

A reduction in the number of hours of employment.

“Loss of eligibility” does not include:

A loss of coverage from a failure to pay premiums on a timely basis;

Voluntary termination of coverage; or

A termination of coverage for cause, such as making a fraudulent claim.

(A)A qualified retiree hired as a new employee or elected as a public official after December 31, 2015, who applies for participation in the program shall pay a premium as determined by the board that includes:

If a retiree enrolled in the program within the first three (3) years of employment with a participating entity, an appropriate premium rate for a retiree;

If a retiree enrolled in the program between the fourth and thirteenth year of employment with a participating entity, an additional five percent (5%) of the premium rate;

If a retiree enrolled in the program between the fourteenth and twenty-third year of employment with a participating entity, an additional ten percent (10%) of the premium rate; and

If a retiree enrolled in the program after the twenty-third year of employment with a participating entity, an additional fifteen percent (15%) of the premium rate.

(i)A retiree shall be continuously enrolled in the program if actively employed in a position that is eligible to participate in the program.

(a)A retiree who has a break in enrollment in the program may be considered to be continuously enrolled in the program if the retiree:

If a retiree declines to participate in the program upon returning to active employment under subdivision (a)(5)(B)(ii)(a) of this section, the retiree may participate in the program based on the year of the retiree's most recent enrollment in the program.

A retiree who declines to participate in the program at the time of retirement is not considered continuously enrolled in the program.

(1)Retirees who draw retirement benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, or the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System and retired contract employees of the Arkansas National Guard who wish to participate in the program shall pay the retiree amount of the premium as determined by the board under subdivision (a)(5) of this section or the cost of the policy issued to the retired participant.

(A)The retiree portion of the premium shall be deducted from:

The retirement benefit check of the retired participant; or

A bank account of the retired participant, to be paid by a monthly bank draft on the date designated by the division.

A dependent may be added to an active or inactive retiree's health insurance coverage by payment of the appropriate premium as established by the board if:

Dependent children may continue to participate in the program until marriage or until the maximum age limit for a dependent child has been reached.

History.

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 13; 1975, No. 575, § 3; 1977, No. 206, § 1; 1983, No. 423, § 4; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3113; Acts 1987, No. 514, § 1; 1997, No. 1295, § 2; 1999, No. 1280, § 9; 2001, No. 1171, § 1; 2001, No. 1752, §§ 1, 2; 2007, No. 1009, § 9; 2013, No. 87, § 1; 2013, No. 331, § 1; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2015, No. 364, §§ 1-5; 2015, No. 913, §§ 1-5; 2019, No. 910, § 6142.

21-5-412. Eligibility of certain elected officials.

Members of the General Assembly and the state-elected constitutional officers who have served a sufficient number of years of credited service to be eligible for retirement benefits upon attainment of retirement age, but who have not yet reached retirement age, shall be eligible to continue to participate in the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program upon leaving elective service.

(1)A person who is leaving the General Assembly or any state-elected constitutional office who wishes to participate in the program shall be offered continuation of coverage under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, Pub. L. No. 99-272.

(A)An elected official with ten (10) or more years of creditable service under the terms of a retirement plan listed under §21-5-411(a)(1)(A) shall qualify for continuation of participation in the program if the elected official is separated from employment because of the expiration of a fixed period of employment.

History.

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 13; 1975, No. 575, § 3; 1977, No. 206, § 1; 1983, No. 423, § 4; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3113; Acts 2007, No. 1009, § 10; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 6143.